Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2409.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The sum of $2,037,000 is hereby appropriated from the Philadelphia Taxicab and Limousine Regulatory Fund to the Philadelphia Parking Authority for the fiscal year July 1, 2026, to June 30, 2027.Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026, or immediately, whichever is later.1234567891011